Hawaii statutes.
PART 6.
DEFAULT

Subpart 1. Default and Enforcement of Security
Interest

§490:9-601 Rights after default; judicial
enforcement; consignor or buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment
intangibles, or promissory notes. (a) After default, a secured party has
the rights provided in this part and, except as otherwise provided in section
490:9-602, those provided by agreement of the parties. A secured party:

(1) May reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose, or
otherwise enforce the claim, security interest, or agricultural lien by any
available judicial procedure; and

(2) If the collateral is documents, may proceed
either as to the documents or as to the goods they cover.

(b) A secured party in possession of
collateral or control of collateral under section 490:7-106, 490:9-104,
490:9-105, 490:9-106, or 490:9-107 has the rights and duties provided in
section 490:9-207.

(c) The rights under subsections (a) and (b)
are cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(g) and section 490:9-605, after default, a debtor and an obligor have the
rights provided in this part and by agreement of the parties.

(e) If a secured party has reduced its claim
to judgment, the lien of any levy that may be made upon the collateral by
virtue of an execution based upon the judgment relates back to the earliest of:

(1) The date of perfection of the security interest
or agricultural lien in the collateral;

(2) The date of filing a financing statement covering
the collateral; or

(3) Any date specified in a statute under which the
agricultural lien was created.

(f) A sale pursuant to an execution is a
foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial procedure
within the meaning of this section. A secured party may purchase at the sale
and thereafter hold the collateral free of any other requirements of this
article.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in section
490:9-607(c), this part imposes no duties upon a secured party that is a
consignor or is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or
promissory notes. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 163, §33]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next